Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1530.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Genetic Information Privacy Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Biological sample." A material part of, or discharge from, a human being or a derivative of a material part of, or discharge from, a human being, including tissue, blood, urine and saliva, known to contain DNA."Consumer." An individual who is a resident of this 1234567891011121314151617 Commonwealth."Deidentified data." Data that cannot reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identifiable consumer that is subject to all of the following:(1) Administrative and technical measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated with a particular consumer.(2) A public commitment by a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company to maintain and use the data in a deidentified form and to not attempt to reidentify the data.(3) Legally enforceable contractual obligations that prohibit a recipient of the data from attempting to reidentify the data."Direct-to-consumer genetic testing company" or "company." As follows:(1) An entity that:(i) offers a direct-to-consumer genetic testing product or service; or(ii) collects, uses or analyzes genetic data provided to the entity by a consumer as a result of a direct-to-consumer genetic testing product or service.(2) The term does not include an entity that is only engaged in collecting, using or analyzing genetic data or biological samples in the context of research, as defined in 45 CFR 164.501 (relating to definitions), that is conducted in accordance with 21 CFR Ch. I Subch. A Pts. 50 (relating to protection of human subjects) and 56 (relating to institutional review boards), 45 CFR Subt. A Subch. A Pt. 46 (relating to protection of human subjects) and the Good Clinical Practice Guideline issued by the International Council for Harmonisation.20250HB1530PN1787 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "DNA." Deoxyribonucleic acid."Express consent." A consumer's affirmative response to a clear, meaningful and prominent notice regarding the collection, use or disclosure of genetic data for a specific purpose."Genetic data." Any data, regardless of the format of the data, that concerns a consumer's genetic characteristics. The term does not include deidentified data. The term includes any of the following:(1) Raw sequence data that results from sequencing of a consumer's complete extracted DNA or a portion of the extracted DNA.(2) Genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing the raw sequence data.(3) Self-reported health information that a consumer submits to a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company regarding the consumer's health conditions and that is used for scientific research or product development and analyzed in connection with the consumer's raw sequence data."Genetic testing." A laboratory test of a consumer's complete DNA, regions of DNA, chromosomes, genes or gene products to determine the presence of genetic characteristics of the consumer."Person." An individual, partnership, corporation, association, business, business trust or legal representative of an organization.Section 3. Duties of direct-to-consumer genetic testing companies.In order to safeguard the privacy, confidentiality, security and integrity of a consumer's genetic data, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall have the following duties:20250HB1530PN1787 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Provide clear and complete information regarding the company's policies and procedures for the collection, use or disclosure of genetic data by making all of the following available to a consumer:(i) A high-level privacy policy overview that includes basic, essential information about thecompany's collection, use or disclosure of genetic data.(ii) A prominent, publicly available privacy notice with information about the company's data collection, consent, use, access, disclosure, transfer, security and retention and deletion practices.(2) Obtain a consumer's consent for the collection, use or disclosure of the consumer's genetic data, which includes all of the following:(i) Initial express consent that clearly describes the uses of the consumer's genetic data collected through the genetic testing product or service and specifies who has access to test results and how the genetic data may be shared.(ii) Separate express consent for transferring or disclosing the consumer's genetic data to a person other than the company's vendor or service provider or for using the consumer's genetic data beyond the primary purpose of the genetic testing product or service and inherent contextual uses.(iii) Separate express consent for the retention of a biological sample provided by the consumer after completion of the initial testing service requested by the consumer.(iv) Informed consent in accordance with 45 CFR 20250HB1530PN1787 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Subt. A Subch. A Pt. 46 (relating to protection of human subjects) for the transfer or disclosure of the consumer's genetic data to a third-party person for research purposes or research conducted under the control of the company for the purpose of publication or generalizable knowledge.(v) Express consent for marketing to the consumer based on the consumer's genetic data or for marketing by a third-party person to the consumer based on the consumer having ordered or purchased a genetic testing product or service. As used in this subparagraph, the term "marketing" does not include the provision of customized content or offers on an Internet website or through an application or service provided by a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company with a first-party relationship to a consumer.(3) Require a valid legal process for disclosing genetic data to a law enforcement agency or any other Federal, State or local government entity without the consumer's express written consent.(4) Develop, implement and maintain a comprehensive security program to protect the consumer's genetic data against unauthorized access, use or disclosure.(5) Provide a process for the consumer to:(i) access the consumer's genetic data;(ii) delete the consumer's account and genetic data; and(iii) request and obtain the destruction of the consumer's biological sample.(6) Otherwise comply with Federal and State laws 20250HB1530PN1787 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regarding the privacy, confidentiality, security and integrity of the consumer's genetic data.Section 4. Prohibition on disclosure of genetic data of consumers.Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company may not disclose a consumer's genetic data to any of the following without the consumer's written consent:(1) An entity offering health insurance, life insurance or long-term care insurance.(2) An employer of the consumer.Section 5. Civil penalties.The Office of Attorney General may bring a civil action in the name of the Commonwealth or on behalf of consumers to enforce the provisions of this act in a court of competent jurisdiction. In an action brought under this section, the court may impose a civil penalty of $2,500 for each violation of this act, the recovery of actual damages incurred by consumers on whose behalf the action was brought and the costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the Office of Attorney General.Section 6. Applicability.This act shall not apply to any of the following:(1) Protected health information that is collected by a covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy, security and breach notification regulations issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under 45 CFR Subt. A Subch. C Pts. 160 (relating to general administrative requirements) and 164 (relating to security and privacy) and established under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-20250HB1530PN1787 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 191, 110 Stat. 1936) and the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5, 123 Stat. 226-279 and 467-496).(2) Biological samples or genetic data lawfully obtained by a law enforcement agency from a crime scene reasonably suspected to belong to a putative suspect in a criminal case.(3) Biological samples or genetic data obtained from a deceased individual whose identity is unknown solely for the purposes of identifying the individual.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1530PN1787 - 7 - 1234567891011